src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
| Flag | Explanation
| --- | --- 
|  @U.DECL-NX.SG@ | unify number
|  @U.DECL-NX.PL@ | unify number
|  @R.DECL-NX.PL@ | reset number
|  @U.DECL-CX.ABE@ | unify case for collective noun
|  @U.DECL-CX.ABL@ | unify case for collective noun
|  @U.DECL-CX.ACC@ | unify case for collective noun
|  @U.DECL-CX.ADE@ | unify case for collective noun
|  @U.DECL-CX.ALL@ | unify case for collective noun
|  @U.DECL-CX.COM@ | unify case for collective noun
|  @U.DECL-CX.ELA@ | unify case for collective noun
|  @U.DECL-CX.ESS@ | unify case for collective noun
|  @U.DECL-CX.EXE@ | unify case for collective noun
|  @U.DECL-CX.GEN@ | unify case for collective noun
|  @U.DECL-CX.ILL@ | unify case for collective noun
|  @U.DECL-CX.INE@ | unify case for collective noun
|  @U.DECL-CX.INS@ | unify case for collective noun
|  @U.DECL-CX.NOM@ | unify case for collective noun
|  @U.DECL-CX.PAR@ | unify case for collective noun
|  @U.DECL-CX.PRL@ | unify case for collective noun
|  @U.DECL-CX.TRA@ | unify case for collective noun
|  @U.COMPLETE.YES@ |
|  @D.COMPLETE.YES@ |
|  @C.DECL-CX@ | 
|  @C.DECL-NX@ | 
|  @C.COMPLETE@ | 

## Root lexicon

Root
The word forms  start from the lexeme roots of basic
word classes, or optionally from prefixes:
* **A_izh2x ;**
* **Adp_izh2x ;**
* **Adv_izh2x ;**
* **CC_izh2x ;**
* **CS_izh2x ;**
* **Interj_izh2x ;**
* **N_izh2x ;**
* **Pcle_izh2x ;**
* **Pron_izh2x ;**
* **N_Prop_izh2x ;**
* **Num_izh2x ;**
* **V_izh2x ;**
* **Punctuation ;**
* **Symbols ;**
* **EXCEPTIONS ;**

POS with minimal morphological variation

CC_

CS_

AbbrDot

INTERJ_

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-izh/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>
